Wisconsin, session 2025, AB935.
do enact as follows:Law Revision Committee prefatory note: This bill is a remedial legislation proposal, requested by the Department of Veterans Affairs and introduced by the Law Revision Committee under s. 13.83 (1) (c) 4. and 5., stats. After careful consideration of the various provisions of the bill, the Law Revision Committee has determined that this bill makes minor substantive changes in the statutes, and that these changes are desirable as a matter of public policy.AB935,11Section 1. 45.01 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:AB935,3,2145.01 (4m) “Council” means the council on veterans programs created under 2s. 15.497 (2).Note: Section 1 creates the definition “council” for the Council on Veterans Programs, a body currently housed within the Department of Veterans Affairs. AB935,23Section 2. 45.01 (9) of the statutes is amended to read:AB935,3,7445.01 (9) “Permanently and totally disabled veteran” means a person who is 5receiving 100 percent disability compensation from the U.S. department of veterans 6affairs under 38 USC 1101 to 1115 1104, 1110 to 1120, 1131 to 1137, and 1151 to 71162 1163, due to a permanent and total service-connected disability.Note: Section 2 updates outdated references to federal law. AB935,38Section 3. 45.03 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB935,3,14945.03 (2m) Rule-making Rule making; board comments. The secretary 10shall provide the board with a copy of any rule that the department is preparing as 11a proposed rule under s. 227.14 (1). The board may prepare submit a report to the 12department containing written comments and its opinion regarding the proposed 13rule. In preparing the proposed rule, the department shall include in the analysis 14under s. 227.14 (2) a copy of any such written comments and opinion.Note: Section 3 makes clarifying changes regarding the procedure for the Board of Veterans Affairs to report on rules proposed by the Department of Veterans Affairs.AB935,415Section 4. 45.03 (3) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB935,3,181645.03 (3) (a) The council on veterans programs created under s. 15.497 shall 17advise the board and the department on solutions and policy alternatives relating 18to the problems of veterans.Note: Section 4 replaces an existing reference to the Council on Veterans Programs with “council” because it is a defined term.AB935,519Section 5. 45.03 (3) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB935,4,6145.03 (3) (b) The council on veterans programs and the department, jointly or 2separately, shall submit a report regarding the council on veterans programs to the 3chief clerk of each house of the legislature for distribution to the legislature under s. 413.172 (2) by September 30 of every odd-numbered year. The report shall include a 5general summary of the activities and membership over the past 2 years of the 6council and each organization on the council.Note: Section 5 replaces existing references to the Council on Veterans Programs with “council” because it is a defined term.AB935,67Section 6. 45.03 (13) (f) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB935,4,9845.03 (13) (f) 2. Information on the availability of post-traumatic stress 9disorder medical or mental health services and referrals to those services.Note: Under current law, the Department of Veterans Affairs must provide certain services related to post-traumatic stress disorder to service members and veterans. To fulfill this requirement, the department may provide information on the availability of medical services and referrals. Section 6 specifies that the department may instead fulfill this requirement by providing information on the availability of mental health services and referrals.AB935,710Section 7. 45.03 (13) (j) of the statutes is repealed.Note: Section 7 repeals an obsolete grant program to identify, train, and place volunteers to assist certain persons who return to this state after serving on active duty. The program expired on July 1, 2011.AB935,811Section 8. 45.03 (13) (k) of the statutes is repealed.Note: Section 8 repeals an obsolete grant program for certain housing authorities to supplement the housing costs of chronically homeless veterans and their families. The program expired after the 2006-07 fiscal year.AB935,912Section 9. 45.03 (15) of the statutes is amended to read:AB935,5,61345.03 (15) Deferral of payments and interest on loans. When a veteran 14or a member of the veteran’s family makes application for deferment of payment of 15monthly installments and waiver of interest charges on veterans loans made under 16this chapter, showing that the ability of the veteran to make payment is materially 1and adversely affected by reason of military service, the department may, with the 2approval of the board, defer payment of monthly installments and waive interest 3charges on veterans loans made under this chapter for the duration of any period of 4service in the U.S. armed forces of the United States during a national emergency 5or in time of war or under P.L. 87-117 and 6 months from date of discharge or 6separation and the time for payment may be extended for the same period.Note: Section 9 conforms a military reference to current style.AB935,107Section 10. 45.03 (21) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB935,5,14845.03 (21) (d) Create information on the Internet department’s website about 9the health effects of depleted uranium exposure, the detection programs that are 10available to determine if a national guard member or veteran has been exposed to 11depleted uranium, the federal treatment programs that are available to those who 12may have been exposed to depleted uranium, and the federal and state benefits that 13are available to those national guard members or veterans who have been exposed 14to depleted uranium.Note: Section 10 conforms a website reference to current style.AB935,1115Section 11. 45.04 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB935,5,231645.04 (2) Separation documents. Separation documents and copies of 17separation documents evidencing service in the U.S. armed forces of the U.S. are 18confidential and privileged. Examination of these records in the possession of the 19department or service office is limited to authorized employees of the department 20or service office and information entered in these records may be disclosed only to 21veterans and their duly authorized representatives or to interested governmental 22agencies for the purpose of assisting veterans and their dependents to obtain the 23rights and benefits to which they may be entitled.Note: Section 11 conforms a military reference to current style. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab935 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab935 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB935 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB935 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB935: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting